Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 6 Bank Holding Companies

19-6-1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Company”, “control”, and “subsidiary” have the meaning set forth in the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, 12 U.S.C. § 1841 et seq.

“Rhode Island bank-holding company” means any company, association, partnership, corporation, or any other entity, however formed, that controls a regulated institution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 44.

19-6-2.
Examination powers.

Whenever the director, or the director’s designee, considers it advisable, he or she may make, or cause to be made, an examination of each Rhode Island bank-holding company. The director, or the director’s designee(s), may also examine any deposit-taking subsidiary of the bank-holding company that fails to meet its minimum capital requirements under applicable federal law, or has received from its principal bank regulator, as its last composite rating based on capital, asset quality, management, earnings, and liquidity (CAMEL) or similar regulatory rating, a three, four, five, or other unsatisfactory rating. The director, or the director’s designee, shall have the same examination power and authority as he or she has for the examination of regulated institutions. The total cost of these examinations shall be paid in the same manner as other regulated institutions pursuant to this title. In lieu of this examination, the director, or the director’s designee, shall accept the report of an examination made within the last fifteen (15) months by any federal bank regulatory agency or the equivalent supervisory official of another state, pursuant to the laws of that state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 44.

19-6-3.
Time and frequency of reports of Rhode Island bank-holding companies.

Every Rhode Island bank-holding company shall file an annual financial report with the director, or the director’s designee, signed and sworn to by its president or a vice-president and also by its secretary, treasurer, or auditor, showing the condition of the Rhode Island bank-holding company at the close of business on any past day specified by the director, or the director’s designee. The report shall be transmitted to the director, or the director’s designee, within thirty (30) days of request, exclusive of Sundays and holidays. At the time of filing each report, the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be paid by the Rhode Island bank-holding company to the director to and for the use of the state. A penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day for each day the report is delayed shall be paid to the director to and for the use of the state.

Copies of reports prepared for federal regulatory authorities may be filed in lieu of the above within the time frame required for federal reports, with the above fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 44.

19-6-4.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 44.